Utah statutes.
17B-1-624.   Lapse of appropriations -- Exceptions.

All unexpended or unencumbered appropriations, except capital projects fund appropriations, lapse at the end of the budget year to the respective fund balance.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

